Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-131
Poor person; support by county; when eligible.

When any poor person does not have a spouse, parent, or stepparent supporting him or her or is not eligible for other general assistance programs, the poor person shall receive such relief, referred to as general assistance for purposes of sections 68-131 to 68-148, out of the treasury of the county in which he or she has legal settlement at the time of applying for assistance, in the manner provided in sections 68-131 to 68-148. Any person who is or becomes ineligible for other general assistance programs due to his or her own actions or inactions shall also be ineligible for general assistance from the county.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 4.